Utah statutes.
17D-3-304.   Petition to nominate candidates for election to the board of supervisors.

(1)  A person may be nominated to be a candidate for election as a member of a board of supervisors of a conservation district by a petition filed with the commission no later than the date set by the commission as the close of nominations.

(2)  Each petition under Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  state:

(i)  the candidate's name;

(ii)  that the candidate is at least 18 years of age; and

(iii)  that the candidate is a resident of the conservation district for which the election is to be held;

(b)  contain the signatures of at least six persons who reside and are registered voters within the conservation district; and

(c)  list the name, address, and voting precinct number of each person who signs the petition.



Enacted by Chapter 360, 2008 General Session

